Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-2701 to 77-27,135.01, 77-27,222, 77-27,235, 77-27,236, and 77-27,238 to 77-27,242 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 1, p. 1533;

Laws 1984, LB 1124, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 715, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 40;

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 772, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 775, § 14;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 714, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 762, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 444, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 19;

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 180;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 153;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 69;

Laws 1993, LB 240, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 587, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 815, § 22;

Laws 1994, LB 901, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 938, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 430, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 106, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 182A, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 27;

Laws 2001, LB 172, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 433, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 57, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 947, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 72, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 168, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 1017, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 28, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 872, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 968, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1189, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB223, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB343, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB367, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB9, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 34;

Laws 2012, LB830, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB970, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1080, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB96, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB867, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB3, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB419, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB774, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB57, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB26, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB595, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB917, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB984, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 58;

Laws 2024, LB937, § 67;

Laws 2024, LB1023, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 80.

Section 2-1208 imposes a tax directly upon the licensee racetrack. Section 77-2701 et seq. impose a sales tax upon the purchaser. Thus, section 77-2701 does not conflict with the provisions of section 2-1208 which prohibit any additional taxes from being imposed upon the licensee. Governors of Ak-Sar-Ben v. Department of Rev., 217 Neb. 518, 349 N.W.2d 385 (1984).

The act authorizes the use of the combined or unitary apportionment method of reporting to determine the income of a corporation engaged in a unitary business operation. PMD Investment Co. v. State, 216 Neb. 553, 345 N.W.2d 815 (1984).

This act does not authorize State Tax Commissioner to exclude partners and partnerships nor Subchapter S corporations from benefit of transitional period regulation. Altsuler v. Peters, 190 Neb. 113, 206 N.W.2d 570 (1973).

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 does not violate the Constitution of Nebraska. Anderson v. Tiemann, 182 Neb. 393, 155 N.W.2d 322 (1967).